Nebraska, session 109, LB658.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB658 LB658
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 81-2,239, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
81-2,239 Sections 81-2,239 to 81-2,292 and sections 3 to 9, 11, and
12 of this act and the provisions of the Food Code and the Current Good
Manufacturing Practice In Manufacturing, Packing, or Holding Human Food
adopted by reference in sections 81-2,257.01 and 81-2,259, shall be known
and may be cited as the Nebraska Pure Food Act.
Sec. 2. Section 81-2,240, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2,240 For purposes of the Nebraska Pure Food Act, unless the
context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 81-2,241 to
81-2,254 and sections 3 to 9 of this act shall be used. In addition, the
definitions found in the code and practice adopted by reference in
sections 81-2,257.01 and 81-2,259 shall be used.
Sec. 3. Agricultural food animal means:
(1) Any domesticated animal belonging to the bovine, caprine, ovine,
or porcine species; or
(2) Any domesticated chicken or turkey.
Sec. 4. Cultivated-protein food product means a food product having
one or more sensory attributes that resemble a type of tissue originating
from an agricultural food animal but that, in lieu of being derived from
meat processing, is derived from manufacturing cells or nonanimal
sources, including processes in which one or more stem cells are
initially isolated from an agricultural food animal, are grown in vitro,
and may be manipulated, as part of a manufacturing operation.
Sec. 5. Identifying meat term means any word or phrase that states,
indicates, suggests, or describes a meat product and includes any:
(1) Common name for the species of the agricultural food animal
subject to slaughter and processing, including calf, chicken, cow, goat,
hog, kid, lamb, pig, poultry, sheep, or turkey;
(2) Any characteristic of a species of the agricultural food animal
-2-

LB658 LB658
2025 2025
subject to slaughter and processing, including beef, broiler, cabrito,
chevon, fryer, lamb, mutton, pork, poulet, veal, or yearling; and
(3) Common name used to describe a major cut of a meat of an
agricultural food animal slaughtered and processed, including a major
meat cut or any other common name that a reasonable purchaser would
immediately and exclusively associate with a meat product prepared for
sale in normal commercial channels, including bacon, baloney, bologna,
bone, brat, bratwurst, brisket, burger, butt, chop, chuck, cold cut,
cutlet, filet, flat iron, frank, frankfurter, ham, hamburger, hock, hot
dog, jerky, liverwurst, loin, London broil, lunch meat, New York strip,
pepperoni, porterhouse, rib, ribeye, roast, salami, sausage, shank,
sirloin, sparerib, tenderloin, or any comparable word or phrase.
Sec. 6. Insect-protein food product means a food product having one
or more sensory attributes that resemble a type of tissue originating
from an agricultural food animal but that, in lieu of being derived from
meat processing, is derived from manufacturing insect parts.
Sec. 7. Manufactured-protein food product means a cultivated-
protein food product, insect-protein food product, or plant-protein food
product containing more than a trace amount of plant-protein food
products.
Sec. 8. Plant-protein food product means a food product having one
or more sensory attributes that resemble a type of tissue found in a
species of agricultural food animal but that, in lieu of being derived
from meat processing, is derived from manufacturing plant parts.
Sec. 9. Qualifying term means a word, compound word, or phrase that
would clearly disclose to a reasonable purchaser of meat products that a
food product is not a meat product including cell-cultivated, cell-
cultured, fake, grown in a lab, imitation, insect, insect-based, insect-
protein, lab-created, lab-grown, meat free, meatless, plant, plant-based,
vegan, vegetable, vegetarian, veggie, or any comparable word or phrase.
Sec. 10. Section 81-2,283, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-3-

LB658 LB658
2025 2025
amended to read:
81-2,283 (1) No It shall be unlawful for any person shall to
misbrand any food or distribute, offer for sale, or sell any misbranded
food.
(2) A food shall be deemed to be misbranded if:
(a) It does not bear labeling clearly stating (i) the identity of
the food in terms likely to be easily and accurately understood by the
consumer, (ii) the net quantity of contents of the food in terms
authorized under the Weights and Measures Act, and (iii) the name and
address of the manufacturer, distributor, or seller of the food; or
(b) Its labeling is false or misleading in any manner; .
(c) For any manufactured-protein food product that is labeled with
an identifying meat term, such manufactured-protein food product is not
labeled with a conspicuous and prominent qualifying term in close
proximity to the identifying meat term; or
(d) For any manufactured-protein food product that is labeled with
an identifying meat term and offered for sale at a food establishment,
such manufactured-protein food product is not labeled in a manner that is
clearly and distinctly separate from any product that is made from tissue
originating from any agricultural food animal.
Sec. 11. A manufactured-protein food product is falsely advertised
if:
(1) All advertising for such manufactured-protein food product that
lists an identifying meat term does not include a conspicuous and
prominent qualifying term in close proximity to the identifying meat
term; or
(2) For any manufactured-protein food product that is offered for
sale at a food establishment, such manufactured-protein food product is
not stored in a manner that:
(a) Keeps such product separate from tissue originating from
agricultural food animals; and
-4-

LB658 LB658
2025 2025
(b) Uses distinctive shelf tags or other posted representations to
identify and distinguish such manufactured-protein food product from
tissue originating from agricultural food animals.
Sec. 12. The department may investigate all credible complaints
that food products are misbranded or being falsely advertised as meat
products regardless of whether or not a political subdivision or other
state agency acts as the regulatory authority for food establishment
inspections.
Sec. 13. Original sections 81-2,239, 81-2,240, and 81-2,283,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-5-